Illinois, session 104th, SB50.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Age-Appropriate Design Code Act. 6    Section 5. Intent. It is the intent of the General 7Assembly that nothing in this Act shall be construed to 8infringe on the existing rights and freedoms of children. 9    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 10    "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is 11controlled by, or is under common control with, another legal 12entity. For the purposes of this definition, "control" or 13"controlled" means: (i) ownership of, or the power to vote, 14more than 50% of the outstanding shares of any class of voting 15security of a covered entity; (ii) control in any manner over 16the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals 17exercising similar functions; or (iii) the power to exercise a 18controlling influence over the management of a covered entity.19    "Age-appropriate" means a recognition of the distinct 20needs and diversities of children at different age ranges. In 21order to help support the design of online services, products, 22and features, covered entities should take into account the   SB0050- 2 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1unique needs and diversities of different age ranges, 2including the following developmental stages: 0 to 5 years of 3age or preliterate and early literacy; 6-9 years of age or core 4primary school years; 10 to 12 years of age or transition 5years; 13 to 15 years of age or early teens; and 16 to 17 years 6or age or approaching adulthood.7    "Best interests of children" means the use, by a covered 8entity, of the personal data of a child or the design of an 9online service, product, or feature in a way that: 10        (1) will not benefit the covered entity to the 11    detriment of the child; and 12        (2) will not result in: 13            (A) reasonably foreseeable and material physical 14        or financial harm to the child; 15            (B) reasonably foreseeable and severe 16        psychological, or emotional harm to the child; 17            (C) a highly offensive intrusion on the reasonable 18        privacy expectations of the child; or 19            (D) discrimination against the child based upon 20        race, color, religion, national origin, disability, 21        sex, or sexual orientation. 22    "Child" means a consumer who is under 18 years of age. 23    "Collect" means buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, 24receiving, or accessing any personal data pertaining to a 25consumer by any means. "Collect" includes receiving data from 26the consumer, either actively or passively, or by observing   SB0050- 3 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1the consumer's behavior. 2    "Covered entity" means:3        (1) a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited 4    liability company, corporation, association, or other 5    legal entity that is organized or operated for the profit 6    or financial benefit of its shareholders or other owners; 7    and 8        (2) an affiliate of a covered entity that shares 9    common branding with the covered entity. For the purposes 10    of this definition, "common branding" means a shared name, 11    service mark, or trademark that the average consumer would 12    understand that 2 or more entities are commonly owned.13    For purposes of this Act, for a joint venture or 14partnership composed of covered entities in which each covered 15entity has at least a 40% interest, the joint venture or 16partnership and each covered entity that composes the joint 17venture or partnership shall separately be considered a single 18covered entity, except that personal data in the possession of 19each covered entity and disclosed to the joint venture or 20partnership shall not be shared with the other covered entity. 21    "Consumer" means a natural person who is an Illinois 22resident, however identified, including by any unique 23identifier. 24    "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or 25manipulated with the purpose of subverting or impairing user 26autonomy, decision making, or choice.   SB0050- 4 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    "Data protection impact assessment" means a systematic 2survey to assess compliance with the duty to act in the best 3interests of children and shall include a plan to ensure that 4all online products, services, or features provided by the 5covered entity are designed and offered in a manner consistent 6with the best interests of children reasonably likely to 7access the online product, service, or feature and a 8description of steps the covered entity has taken and will 9take to comply with the duty to act in the best interests of 10children. 11    "Default" means a preselected option adopted by the 12covered entity for the online service, product, or feature. 13    "Deidentified" means data that cannot reasonably be used 14to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an 15identified or identifiable natural person, or a device linked 16to such person, provided that the covered entity that 17possesses the data: 18        (1) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data 19    cannot be associated with a natural person; 20        (2) publicly commits to maintain and use the data only 21    in a deidentified fashion and not attempt to re-identify 22    the data; and 23        (3) contractually obligates any recipients of the data 24    to comply with all provisions of this Act. 25    "Derived data" means data that is created by the 26derivation of information, data, assumptions, correlations,   SB0050- 5 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1inferences, predictions, or conclusions from facts, evidence, 2or another source of information or data about a child or a 3child's device. 4    "Online service, product, or feature" does not mean any of 5the following: 6        (1) telecommunications service, as defined in 47 7    U.S.C. 153; 8        (2) a broadband service as defined in the Public 9    Utilities Act; or 10        (3) the sale, delivery, or use of a physical product. 11    "Personal data" means any information, including derived 12data, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in 13combination with other information, to an identified or 14identifiable natural person. "Personal data" does not include 15de-identified data or publicly available information. For the 16purposes of this definition, "publicly available information" 17means information (i) that is lawfully made available from 18federal, State, or local government records or widely 19distributed media; and (ii) that a controller has a reasonable 20basis to believe a consumer has lawfully made available to the 21general public. 22    "Precise geolocation" means any data that is derived from 23a device and that is used or intended to be used to locate a 24consumer within a geographic area that is equal to or less than 25the area of a circle with a radius of 1,850 feet, except as 26prescribed by regulations.   SB0050- 6 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    "Process" or "processing" means to conduct or direct any 2operation or set of operations performed, whether by manual or 3automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, 4such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis, 5deletion, modification, or otherwise handling of personal 6data.7    "Product experimentation results" means the data that 8companies collect to understand the experimental impact of 9their products. 10    "Profiling" means any form of automated processing of 11personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal 12aspects concerning an identified or identifiable natural 13person's economic situation, health, personal preferences, 14interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements. 15"Profiling" does not include the processing of information 16that does not result in an assessment or judgment about a 17natural person. 18    "Reasonably likely to be accessed" means an online 19service, product, or feature that is accessed by children 20based on any of the following indicators: 21        (1) the online service, product, or feature is 22    directed to children, as defined by the Children's Online 23    Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq., and the 24    Federal Trade Commission rules implementing that Act; 25        (2) the online service, product, or feature is 26    determined, based on competent and reliable evidence   SB0050- 7 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    regarding audience composition, to be routinely accessed 2    by a significant number of children; 3        (3) the online service, product, or feature contains 4    advertisements marketed to children; 5        (4) the online service, product, or feature is 6    substantially similar or the same as an online service, 7    product, or feature subject to paragraph (2) of this 8    definition; 9        (5) a significant amount of the audience of the online 10    service, product, or feature is determined, based on 11    internal company research, to be children; and12        (6) the covered entity knew or should have known that 13    a significant number of users are children, provided that, 14    in making this assessment, the covered entity shall not 15    collect or process any personal data that is not 16    reasonably necessary to provide an online service, 17    product, or feature with which a child is actively and 18    knowingly engaged. 19    "Sale" or "sell" means the exchange of personal data for 20monetary or other valuable consideration by a covered entity 21to a third party. "Sale" or "sell" do not include the 22following: 23        (1) the disclosure of personal data to a third party 24    who processes the personal data on behalf of the covered 25    entity; 26        (2) the disclosure of personal data to a third party   SB0050- 8 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    with whom the consumer has a direct relationship for 2    purposes of providing a product or service requested by 3    the consumer; 4        (3) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an 5    affiliate of the covered entity; 6        (4) the disclosure of data that the consumer 7    intentionally made available to the general public via a 8    channel of mass media and did not restrict to a specific 9    audience; or 10        (5) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a 11    third party as an asset that is part of a completed or 12    proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other 13    transaction in which the third party assumes control of 14    all or part of the covered entity's assets. 15    "Share" means sharing, renting, releasing, disclosing, 16disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise 17communicating orally, in writing, or by electronic or other 18means a consumer's personal data by the covered entity to a 19third party for cross-context behavioral advertising, whether 20or not for monetary or other valuable consideration, including 21transactions between a covered entity and a third party for 22cross-context behavioral advertising for the benefit of a 23covered entity in which no money is exchanged. 24    "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public 25authority, agency, or body other than the consumer or the 26covered entity.   SB0050- 9 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    Section 15. Information fiduciary. All covered entities 2that operate in this State and process children's data in any 3capacity shall do so in a manner consistent with the best 4interests of children. 5    Section 20. Scope; exclusions. 6    (a) A covered entity operating in this State is subject to 7the requirements of this Act if it: 8        (1) collects consumers' personal data or has 9    consumers' personal data collected on its behalf by a 10    third party;11        (2) alone or jointly with others, determines the 12    purposes and means of the processing of consumers' 13    personal data; and14        (3) satisfies one or more of the following thresholds: 15            (i) has annual gross revenues in excess of 16        $25,000,000, as adjusted every odd numbered year to 17        reflect the Consumer Price Index; 18            (ii) alone or in combination, annually buys, 19        receives for the covered entity's commercial purposes, 20        sells, or shares for commercial purposes, alone or in 21        combination, the personal data of 50,000 or more 22        consumers, households, or devices; or 23            (iii) derives 50% or more of its annual revenues 24        from selling consumers' personal data.   SB0050- 10 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    (b) This Act does not apply to: 2        (1) protected health information that is collected by 3    a covered entity or covered entity associate governed by 4    the privacy, security, and breach notification rules 5    issued by the United States Department of Health and Human 6    Services, 45 CFR 160 and 164, established pursuant to the 7    Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 8    1996, Public Law 104-191, and the Health Information 9    Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, Public 10    Law 111-5; 11        (2) a covered entity governed by the privacy, 12    security, and breach notification rules issued by the 13    United States Department of Health and Human Services, 45 14    CFR 160 and 164, established pursuant to the Health 15    Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 16    Public Law 104-191, to the extent the provider or covered 17    entity maintains patient information in the same manner as 18    medical information or protected health information as 19    described in paragraph (1); or 20        (3) information collected as part of a clinical trial 21    subject to the federal policy for the protection of human 22    subjects, also known as the common rule, pursuant to good 23    clinical practice guidelines issued by the International 24    Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for 25    Pharmaceuticals for Human Use or human subject protection 26    requirements issued by the United States Food and Drug   SB0050- 11 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    Administration. 2    Section 25. Requirements for covered entities. 3    (a) A covered entity subject to this Act shall: 4        (1) complete a data protection impact assessment for 5    an online service, product, or feature or any new online 6    service, product, or feature that is reasonably likely to 7    be accessed by children; and maintain documentation of the 8    data protection impact assessment for as long as the 9    online service, product, or feature is reasonably likely 10    to be accessed by children; 11        (2) review and modify all data protection impact 12    assessments as necessary to account for material changes 13    to processing pertaining to the online service, product, 14    or feature within 90 days after such material changes; 15        (3) within 5 business days after a written request by 16    the Attorney General, provide to the Attorney General a 17    list of all data protection impact assessments the covered 18    entity has completed; 19        (4) within 7 business days after a written request by 20    the Attorney General, provide the Attorney General with a 21    copy of any data protection impact assessment, unless the 22    Attorney General, in its discretion, extends the time 23    period for a covered entity to respond; 24        (5) configure all default privacy settings provided to 25    children by the online service, product, or feature to   SB0050- 12 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    settings that offer a high level of privacy, unless the 2    covered entity can demonstrate a compelling reason that a 3    different setting is in the best interests of children; 4        (6) provide any privacy information, terms of service, 5    policies, and community standards concisely, prominently, 6    and using clear language suited to the age of children 7    reasonably likely to access that online service, product, 8    or feature; and 9        (7) provide prominent, accessible, and responsive 10    tools to help children, or if applicable their parents or 11    guardians, exercise their privacy rights and report 12    concerns. 13    (b) A data protection, impact assessment required by this 14Section shall identify the purpose of the online service, 15product, or feature; how it uses children's personal data; and 16determine whether the online service, product, or feature is 17designed and offered in a age-appropriate manner consistent 18with the best interests of children that are reasonably likely 19to access the online product by examining, at a minimum, the 20following: 21        (1) whether the design of the online service, product, 22    or feature could lead to children experiencing or being 23    targeted by contacts on the online service, product, or 24    feature that would result in: reasonably foreseeable and 25    material physical or financial harm to the child; 26    reasonably foreseeable and severe psychological or   SB0050- 13 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    emotional harm to the child; a highly offensive intrusion 2    on the reasonable privacy expectations of the child; or 3    discrimination against the child based upon race, color, 4    religion, national origin, disability, sex, or sexual 5    orientation; 6        (2) whether the design of the online service, product, 7    or feature could permit children to witness, participate 8    in, or be subject to conduct on the online service, 9    product, or feature that would result in: reasonably 10    foreseeable and material physical or financial harm to the 11    child; reasonably foreseeable and severe psychological or 12    emotional harm to the child; a highly offensive intrusion 13    on the reasonable privacy expectations of the child; or 14    discrimination against the child based upon race, color, 15    religion, national origin, disability, sex, or sexual 16    orientation; 17        (3) whether the design of the online service, product, 18    or feature are reasonably expected to allow children to be 19    party to or exploited by a contract on the online service, 20    product, or feature that would result in: reasonably 21    foreseeable and material physical or financial harm to the 22    child; reasonably foreseeable and severe psychological or 23    emotional harm to the child; a highly offensive intrusion 24    on the reasonable privacy expectations of the child; or 25    discrimination against the child based upon race, color, 26    religion, national origin, disability, sex, or sexual   SB0050- 14 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    orientation; 2        (4) whether algorithms used by the product, service, 3    or feature would result in: reasonably foreseeable and 4    material physical or financial harm to the child; 5    reasonably foreseeable and severe psychological or 6    emotional harm to the child; a highly offensive intrusion 7    on the reasonable privacy expectations of the child; or 8    discrimination against the child based upon race, color, 9    religion, national origin, disability, sex, or sexual 10    orientation; 11        (5) whether targeted advertising systems used by the 12    online service, product, or feature would result in: 13    reasonably foreseeable and material physical or financial 14    harm to the child; reasonably foreseeable and severe 15    psychological or emotional harm to the child; a highly 16    offensive intrusion on the reasonable privacy expectations 17    of the child; or discrimination against the child based 18    upon race, color, religion, national origin, disability, 19    sex, or sexual orientation; 20        (6) whether the online service, product, or feature 21    uses system design features to increase, sustain, or 22    extend use of the online service, product, or feature by 23    children, including the automatic playing of media, 24    rewards for time spent, and notifications, that would 25    result in: reasonably foreseeable and material physical or 26    financial harm to the child; reasonably foreseeable and   SB0050- 15 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    severe psychological or emotional harm to the child; a 2    highly offensive intrusion on the reasonable privacy 3    expectations of the child; or discrimination against the 4    child based upon race, color, religion, national origin, 5    disability, sex, or sexual orientation; and 6        (7) whether, how, and for what purpose the online 7    product, service, or feature collects or processes 8    personal data of children, and whether those practices 9    would result in: reasonably foreseeable and material 10    physical or financial harm to the child; reasonably 11    foreseeable and severe psychological or emotional harm to 12    the child; a highly offensive intrusion on the reasonable 13    privacy expectations of the child; or discrimination 14    against the child based upon race, color, religion, 15    national origin, disability, sex, or sexual orientation; 16    and17        (8) whether and how product experimentation results 18    for the online product, service, or feature reveal data 19    management or design practices that would result in: 20    reasonably foreseeable and material physical or financial 21    harm to the child; reasonably foreseeable and extreme 22    psychological or emotional harm to the child; a highly 23    offensive intrusion on the reasonable privacy expectations 24    of the child; or discrimination against the child based 25    upon race, color, religion, national origin, disability, 26    sex, or sexual orientation.   SB0050- 16 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    (c) A data protection impact assessment conducted by a 2covered entity for the purpose of compliance with any other 3law complies with this Section if the data protection impact 4assessment meets the requirement of this Act. 5    (d) A single data protection impact assessment may contain 6multiple similar processing operations that present similar 7risk only if each relevant online service, product, or feature 8is addressed.9    (e) A company may process only the personal data 10reasonably necessary to provide an online service, product, or 11feature with which a child is actively and knowingly engaged 12to estimate age. 13    Section 30. Prohibited acts by covered entities. A covered 14entity that provides an online service, product, or feature 15reasonably likely to be accessed by children shall not: 16        (1) process the personal data of any child in a way 17    that is inconsistent with the best interests of children 18    reasonably likely to access the online service, product, 19    or feature; 20        (2) profile a child by default unless:21            (A) the covered entity can demonstrate it has 22        appropriate safeguards in place to ensure that 23        profiling is consistent with the best interests of 24        children reasonably likely to access the online 25        service, product, or feature; and  SB0050- 17 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1            (B) either of the following is true: 2                (i) profiling is necessary to provide the 3            online service, product, or feature requested and 4            only with respect to the aspects of the online 5            service, product, or feature with which a child is 6            actively and knowingly engaged; 7                (ii) the covered entity can demonstrate a 8            compelling reason that profiling is in the best 9            interests of children; 10        (3) process any personal data that is not reasonably 11    necessary to provide an online service, product, or 12    feature with which a child is actively and knowingly 13    engaged; 14        (4) if the end user is a child, process personal data 15    for any reason other than a reason for which that personal 16    data was collected; 17        (5) process any precise geolocation information of 18    children by default, unless the collection of that precise 19    geolocation information is strictly necessary for the 20    covered entity to provide the service, product, or feature 21    requested and then only for the limited time that the 22    collection of precise geolocation information is necessary 23    to provide the service, product, or feature; 24        (6) process any precise geolocation information of a 25    child without providing an obvious sign to the child for 26    the duration of that collection that precise geolocation   SB0050- 18 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    information is being collected; 2        (7) use dark patterns to cause children to provide 3    personal data beyond what is reasonably expected to 4    provide that online service, product, or feature to forgo 5    privacy protections, or to take any action that the 6    covered entity knows, or has reason to know, is not in the 7    best interests of children reasonably likely to access the 8    online service, product, or feature; and 9        (8) allow a child's parent, guardian, or any other 10    consumer to monitor the child's online activity or track 11    the child's location, without providing an obvious signal 12    to the child when the child is being monitored or tracked. 13    Section 35. Data practices. 14    (a) A data protection impact assessment collected or 15maintained by the Attorney General under Section 25 is 16classified as nonpublic data. 17    (b) To the extent any information contained in a data 18protection impact assessment disclosed to the Attorney General 19includes information subject to attorney-client privilege or 20work product protection, disclosure does not constitute a 21waiver of that privilege or protection. 22    Section 40. Attorney General enforcement. 23    (a) A covered entity that violates this Act may be subject 24to an injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not more   SB0050- 19 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1than $2,500 per affected child for each negligent violation, 2or not more than $7,500 per affected child for each 3intentional violation, which may be assessed or recovered only 4in a civil action brought by the Attorney General. If the State 5prevails in an action to enforce this Act, the State may, in 6addition to civil penalties provided by this subsection or 7other remedies provided by the law, be allowed an amount 8determined by the court to be the reasonable value of all or 9part of the State's litigation expenses incurred. 10    (b) All moneys received by the Attorney General as civil 11penalties, fees, or other amounts under subsection (a) shall 12be deposited into the Age-Appropriate Design Code Enforcement 13Fund, a special fund created in the State treasury, and shall 14be used, subject to appropriation and as directed by the 15Attorney General, to offset costs incurred by the Attorney 16General in connection with the enforcement of this Act.17    (c) If a covered entity is in substantial compliance with 18the requirements of Section 25, the Attorney General shall, 19before initiating a civil action under this Section, provide 20written notice to the covered entity identifying the specific 21provisions of this Act that the Attorney General alleges have 22been or are being violated. If, for a covered entity that 23satisfied Section 50 or subsection (a) of Section 25 before 24offering any new online product, service, or feature 25reasonably likely to be accessed by children to the public, 26within 90 days after the notice required by this subsection,   SB0050- 20 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1the covered entity cures any noticed violation and provides 2the Attorney General a written statement that the alleged 3violations have been cured, and sufficient measures have been 4taken to prevent future violations, the covered entity is not 5liable for a civil penalty for any violation cured pursuant to 6this Act.7    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to create a 8private right of action. 9    Section 45. Limitations. Nothing in this Act shall be 10interpreted or construed to: 11        (1) impose liability in a manner that is inconsistent 12    with 47 U.S.C. 230; 13        (2) prevent or preclude any child from deliberately or 14    independently searching for, or specifically requesting, 15    content; or 16        (3) require a covered entity to implement an age 17    gating requirement. 18    Section 50. Data protection impact assessment date. 19    (a) By January 1, 2026 a covered entity shall complete a 20data protection impact assessment for any online service, 21product, or feature reasonably likely to be accessed by 22children offered to the public before January 1, 2026, unless 23that online service, product, or feature is exempt under 24paragraph (b).   SB0050- 21 -LRB104 03752 SPS 13776 b1    (b) This Act does not apply to an online service, product, 2or feature that is not offered to the public on or after 3January 1, 2026. 4    Section 55. Severability. If any provision of this Act, or 5an amendment made by this Act, is determined to be 6unenforceable or invalid, the remaining provisions of this Act 7and the amendments made by this Act shall not be affected. 8    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 9Section 5.1030 as follows: 10    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)11    Sec. 5.1030. The Age-Appropriate Design Code Enforcement 12Fund. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.